Washington statutes.
RCW 40.07.010

Legislative declaration.

It is the intent of this legislation [act] to improve executive management and control of state publications and reduce state expenditures through: (1) Elimination of reports and publications which are economically or otherwise unjustified; and (2) the simplification and consolidation of other reports and publications.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 232 s 1.]